Utah statutes.
20A-5-400.5.   Election officer for bond and leeway elections -- Billing.
(1)  When a voted leeway or bond election is held on the regular general
election date or regular primary election date, the county clerk shall serve
as the election officer to conduct and administer that election.
(2) (a)  When a voted leeway or bond election is held on the municipal general
election date or any other election date permitted for special elections under
Section 20A-1-204, and the local political subdivision calling the election is
entirely within the boundaries of the unincorporated county, the county clerk
shall serve as the election officer to conduct and administer that election
subject to Subsection (3).
(b)  When a voted leeway or bond election is held on the municipal general
election date or any other election date permitted for special elections under
Section 20A-1-204, and the local political subdivision calling the election is
entirely within the boundaries of a municipality, the municipal clerk for that
municipality shall, except as provided in Subsection (3), serve as the
election officer to conduct and administer that election.
(c)  When a voted leeway or bond election is held on the municipal general
election date or any other election date permitted for special elections under
Section 20A-1-204, and the local political subdivision calling the election
extends beyond the boundaries of a single municipality:
(i)  except as provided in Subsection (3), the municipal clerk shall serve as
the election officer to conduct and administer the election for those portions
of the local political subdivision where the municipal general election or
other election is being held; and
(ii)  except as provided in Subsection (3), the county clerk shall serve as
the election officer to conduct and administer the election for the
unincorporated county and for those portions of any municipality where no
municipal general election or other election is being held.
(3)  When a voted leeway or bond election is held on a date when no other
election, other than another voted leeway or bond election, is being held in
the entire area comprising the local political subdivision calling the voted
leeway or bond election:
(a)  the clerk or chief executive officer of a local district or the business
administrator or superintendent of the school district, as applicable, shall
serve as the election officer to conduct and administer the bond election for
those portions of the local political subdivision in which no other election,
other than another voted leeway or bond election, is being held, unless the
local district or school district has contracted with the county clerk,
municipal clerk, or both, to serve as the election officer; and
(b)  the county clerk, municipal clerk, or both, as determined by the local
political subdivision holding the bond election, shall serve as the election
officer to conduct and administer the bond election for those portions of the
local political subdivision in which another election, other than another
voted leeway or bond election is being held.
(4) (a)  In conducting elections under this section:
(i)  the local political subdivision shall provide and pay for election
notices; and
(ii)  the election officer shall determine polling locations and compile,
prepare, and count the ballots.
(b)  The county clerk, the municipal clerk, or both shall:
(i)  establish fees for conducting voted leeway and bond elections for local
political subdivisions; and
(ii)  bill each local political subdivision for the cost of conducting the
voted leeway or bond election.
(c) (i)  The fees and charges assessed by a county clerk or a municipal clerk
under this section may not exceed the actual costs incurred by the county
clerk or the municipal clerk.
(ii)  The actual costs shall include:
(A)  costs of or rental fees associated with the use of election equipment and
supplies; and
(B)  reasonable and necessary administrative costs.
(5)  An election officer administering and conducting a voted leeway or bond
election is authorized to appoint or employ agents and professional services
to assist in conducting and administering the voted leeway or bond election.
(6)  The election officer in a voted leeway or bond election shall conduct its
procedures under the direction of the local political subdivision calling the
voted leeway or bond election.
